Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-303 Informational and comment
proceeding. (a) An informational and comment proceeding on the
application shall not be mandatory and whether an informational and comment
proceeding is held shall be within the commissioner's discretion, regardless of
whether any person has requested one.

(b) If the commissioner determines that an
informational and comment proceeding is warranted, the commissioner shall
notify the applicant and every person who has requested an informational and
comment proceeding of the time, date, and place of the proceeding at least ten
days prior to the proceeding. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next